el: Μετρητής καλωδίου μνήμης: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Άλλο
en: Memory wire gauge: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Other
ja: メモリーワイヤーゲージ: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; その他
zh-TW: 記憶金屬線線規: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; 其他
ru: Калибр проволоки с памятью: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Другое
da: Måler til hukommelsestråd: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Andet
cs: Tloušťka paměťového drátu: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Jiné
de: Stärke des Memory-Drahts: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Sonstiges
fr: Calibre du fil à mémoire de forme: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Autre
ko: 메모리 와이어 게이지: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; 기타
bg-BG: Дебелина на мемори телта: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Друго
tr: Hafıza teli ölçüsü: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Diğer
ro-RO: Calibru de sârmă cu memorie: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Altele
nl: Memorydraad dikte: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Overige
pl: Grubość drutu pamięciowego: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Inne
zh-CN: 记忆线规格: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; 其他
lt-LT: Atminties vielos storis: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Kita
pt-BR: Arame de memória calibre: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Outro
nb: Tykkelse på memory wire: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Annet
it: Calibro del memory wire: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Altro
th: ขนาดลวดเมมโมรี่: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; อื่นๆ
vi: Dây đo độ cứng của bộ nhớ: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Khác
pt-PT: Calibre do fio de memória: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Outro
sv: Tjocklek på minnestråd: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Annat
es: Calibre del alambre con memoria: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Otro
fi: Muistilangan paksuusluokka: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Muu
hu: Memóriahuzal vastagsága: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Egyéb
sl-SI: Debelina žice s spominom oblike: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Drugo
sk-SK: Hrúbka pamäťového drôtu: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Iné
hr-HR: Mjerač memorijske žice: 12 AWG; 14 AWG; 16 AWG; 18 AWG; 20 AWG; 22 AWG; 24 AWG; 26 AWG; 28 AWG; 30 AWG; Ostalo